Maryland, session 2025, HB1163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force to Study Fencing for Bodies of Water and Playgrounds.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Planning, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee;
(6) the Superintendent of the Maryland Park Service, or the
Superintendent’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1163*

HOUSE BILL 1163
(7) the State Coordinator for Autism Strategy, or the State Coordinator’s
designee;
(8) the Executive Director of the Maryland Developmental Disabilities
Council, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(9) the Director of the Charles County Department of Recreation, Parks,
and Tourism, or the Director’s designee;
(10) one representative of The Arc Maryland;
(11) one representative of the Charles County Parent Support Group;
(12) one representative of the Maryland Center for Developmental
Disabilities at the Kennedy Krieger Institute;
(13) one representative of Pathfinders for Autism; and
(14) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) at least one representative of the residential construction
industry; and
(ii) one representative of a homeowners association or an entity that
represents homeowners associations.
(c) The State Coordinator for Autism Strategy, or the State Coordinator’s
designee, shall chair the Task Force.
(d) The Maryland Autism Coalition shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) review best practices for fencing bodies of water, including man–made
bodies of water, and playgrounds;
(2) assess how fencing and similar environmental interventions can be
used to prevent injuries and fatalities that occur in or around bodies of water and
playgrounds;

HOUSE BILL 1163 3
(3) examine data and research related to incidents of wandering and
drowning, with an emphasis on incidents involving individuals with autism; and
(4) make recommendations on possible interventions to fence bodies of
water and playgrounds to prevent injuries and fatalities.
(g) On or before July 1, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.